Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.390

Renewal of dealer's license.

If an application for renewal of the dealer's license provided for in RCW 15.49.380, is not filed prior to the business license expiration date, the business license delinquency fee must be assessed under chapter 19.02 RCW and must be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued.

[ 2013 c 144 s 7; 1982 c 182 s 25; 1969 c 63 s 39.]

NOTES:

Business licensing

delinquency fee—Rate—Disposition: RCW 19.02.085.

expiration date: RCW 19.02.090.